Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1003
Act; applicability.

(1) Nothing in the Nebraska Sale of Checks and Funds Transmission Act shall apply to the sale or issuance of checks or the transmission of money by:

(a) Departments or agencies of the United States or of any state or municipal government; or

(b) Financial institutions.

(2) The act shall not apply to the receipt of money by an incorporated telegraph company as described in section 86-601 at any office of such company for immediate transmission by telegraph if the business of such company is not limited solely to the transmission of money.

Laws 1965, c. 26, § 3, p. 193;

Laws 1994, LB 877, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 53, § 10;

Laws 2003, LB 217, § 20;

Laws 2004, LB 999, § 8.